Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 90
COLORADO CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS ACT

Law reviews:

For article, "House Bill 1489: Additional Steps To Simplify

C

olorado's Business Entity Legislation", see 30

C

olo. Law. 29 (Jan. 2001); for article, "Colorado Choice of Form of Organization and Structure 2001", see 30 Colo. Law. 11 (Oct. 2001); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2001 Update", see 30 Colo. Law. 81 (Oct. 2001); for article, "No Paper Required: Business Entity Legislation Makes Life Easier for Business Lawyers", see 33 Colo. Law. 11 (June 2004); for article, "Conversion of Entities in Colorado", see 33 Colo. Law. 11 (Nov. 2004); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Registration: 2004 Update", see 34 Colo. Law. 11 (Jan. 2005); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and Customs in Colorado--Part I", see 41 Colo. Law. 57 (Nov. 2012); for article, "Entity and Trade Name Filing Requirements and Customs in Colorado--Part II", see 41 Colo. Law. 25 (Dec. 2012); for article, "2019 Colorado Business Law Updates: Revising the Colorado Business Corporation Act and the Colorado Corporations and Associations Act", see 48 Colo. Law. 26 (Nov. 2019); for article, "2021 Amendments to Statutes Governing Colorado Entities: Expanding the Ability to Conduct Business Activities Electronically", see 50 Colo. Law. 24 (Aug.-Sept. 2021).

Section

PART 1 DEFINITIONS AND APPLICATION - SPECIAL RULES

PART 2 MERGER AND CONVERSION OF ENTITIES

PART 3 FILING DOCUMENTS

PART 4 SECRETARY OF STATE

PART 5 ANNUAL REPORTS - STATEMENT OF PERSON NAMED IN FILED DOCUMENT

PART 6 ENTITY NAMES

PART 7 REGISTERED AGENT - SERVICE OF PROCESS - CHANGE OF PRINCIPAL OFFICE

PART 8 FOREIGN ENTITIES

PART 9 DELINQUENCY - DISSOLUTION UPON EXPIRATION OF TERM - NOTICE TO CREDITORS BY AND ENFORCEMENT OF CLAIMS AGAINST DISSOLVED ENTITIES

SUBPART 1 DELINQUENCY

SUBPART 2 DISSOLUTION UPON EXPIRATION OF TERM OR OF DELINQUENT ENTITY

SUBPART 3 NOTICE TO CREDITORS BY DISSOLVED ENTITIES - ENFORCEMENT OF CLAIMS AGAINST DISSOLVED ENTITIES

PART 10 REINSTATEMENT OF DISSOLVED ENTITIES